Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1642
Petition; hearing, when required; objections; requirements; resolution of county board; contents.

(1) If special assessments are proposed to be levied in the proposed district, any person that owns real property in the proposed district may file a written objection to the formation of the district. Such written objection shall:

(a) Include any reason why such person objects to the formation of such district; and

(b) Be filed with the county clerk prior to the time set for the hearing pursuant to section 39-1641, if any.

(2) If written objections are filed by one or more persons that own more than a combined fifty percent in area of the real property in the proposed district, the resolution proposed under section 39-1639 shall not be passed and no hearing shall be held.

(3) At the hearing, all persons interested in the proposed improvement shall be given an opportunity to be heard on any matters affecting the formation of the district or the improvements to be made in such district.

(4) The hearing may be continued from time to time to give opportunity to ascertain all pertinent information.

(5) At or following such hearing, or at any subsequent meeting of the board if no hearing was required, the board may pass the resolution as proposed, amend the resolution and pass the amended resolution, or deny passage of the resolution. The amendments may, among other things, exclude any tracts included in the proposed resolution, include additional property in the district, or change the boundaries of the proposed district.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 5, p. 681;

Laws 1981, LB 200, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 54.
July 18, 2026